Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-8,140
Rules and
regulations.

The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to determine teacher shortage areas and to
carry out the Excellence
in Teaching Act.

Laws 2000, LB 1399, § 23;

Laws 2009, LB547, § 15.